Utah statutes.
63K-5-402.   Chapter takes effect when Idaho provisions enacted.
(1)  This chapter takes effect when statutory provisions are enacted by Idaho
that are reciprocal to the provisions of this chapter.
(2)  This chapter remains in effect as long as the statutory provisions
enacted by Idaho under Subsection (1) are in effect.
